Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB456.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Restroom Access Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Customer." An individual who is lawfully on the premises of a retail establishment and who uses an ostomy device or who suffers from an inflammatory bowel disease, including Crohn's disease, ulcerative colitis or any other medical condition that requires immediate access to a toilet facility."Retail establishment." A place of business open to the 1234567891011121314151617 general public for the sale of goods or services.Section 3. Customer access to retail establishment toilet facilities.(a) Requirement.--A retail establishment that has a toilet facility for its employees shall allow a customer to use that facility during normal business hours if all of the following apply:(1) The toilet facility is not located in an area where providing access would create an obvious health or safety risk to the customer or an obvious security risk to the retail establishment.(2) A public restroom is not immediately accessible to the customer.(3) The customer provides the retail establishment with evidence that the customer uses an ostomy device or suffers from an inflammatory bowel disease, including Crohn's disease, ulcerative colitis or any other medical condition that requires immediate access to a toilet facility. The customer must provide:(i) documentation in writing by the customer's physician; or(ii) an identification card that is issued to the customer by a nonprofit organization whose purpose includes serving individuals who suffer from the disease or condition.(b) Construction.--Subsection (a) shall not be construed to require a retail establishment to make a physical change to a restroom to be in compliance with subsection (a).Section 4. Penalty and jurisdiction.(a) Penalty.--A retail establishment that violates the 20250HB0456PN0438 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of this act is subject to a civil penalty of up to $500.(b) Jurisdiction.--The magisterial district judge for the jurisdiction in which the retail establishment is located may impose the civil penalty authorized under this section.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0456PN0438 - 3 - 1234567